Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-102
Wards; number; how determined.

Unless the city elects council members at large as provided in section 32-554, each city of the second class shall be divided into not less than two nor more than six wards, as provided by ordinance of the city council. Each ward shall contain, as nearly as practicable, an equal portion of the population.

Laws 1879, § 2, p. 193;

R.S.1913, § 4994;

C.S.1922, § 4163;

C.S.1929, § 17-102;

Laws 1935, c. 32, § 1, p. 137;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-102;

R.S.1943, § 17-102;

Laws 1969, c. 257, § 5, p. 934;

Laws 2016, LB702, § 1.

The mayor and council of city of second class may change the number and boundaries of wards subject to the limitations that there shall be not less than two, nor more than six wards. Tattersall v. Nevels, 77 Neb. 843, 110 N.W. 708 (1906).

While there is no express authority conferred upon village trustees to divide the city into wards and call an election, such power is clearly implied. State ex rel. Hostetter v. Holden, 19 Neb. 249, 27 N.W. 120 (1886).